Mississippi, session 2026, SB2758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  As used in this article, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein: (a) "Corporation" means the Mississippi Home Corporation. (b)  "Eligible applicants" mean counties, municipalities and public utility authorities organized under Mississippi law.  Private developers may not directly apply for program funds, but may satisfy all or part of the required matching funds under Section 6 of this article through documented capital investment or infrastructure contributions. (c)  "Fund" means the Mississippi Housing Infrastructure Support Fund created under Section 3 of this article. (d)  "Nonstate matching funds" or "matching funds" means contributions toward total project costs provided through local governments, private developers or a combination of both. (e) "Program" means the Mississippi Housing Infrastructure Support Program created under Section 2 of this article. SECTION 2. (1)  The Mississippi Housing Infrastructure Support Program is created to assist eligible applicants with the cost of housing-related infrastructure to support workforce and affordable housing development across the state.  The program shall be limited exclusively to infrastructure improvements necessary to enable housing development and shall not provide funding toward housing construction, rental assistance or direct subsidies. (2)  The corporation shall: (a)  Administer the program; (b)  Adopt and promulgate rules, guidelines, forms, regulations and application procedures necessary to administer the program; (c)  Evaluate applications submitted by eligible applicants; and (d)  Verify all matching funds required under Section 6 of this article. SECTION 3. (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Housing Infrastructure Support Fund."  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund.  The fund shall consist of: (a)  Monies deposited into the fund by the State Treasurer; (b)  The interest accruing to the fund; (c)  Monies received from the federal government; (d)  Gifts, grants and donations; (e)  Loan repayments; and (f)  Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by or allowable under law. (2)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the corporation, as authorized under this article, to provide grants and low-interest loans to eligible applicants exclusively for the purpose of public infrastructure improvements necessary to enable housing development.  Grants and loans shall be specified by amount, recipient and purpose.  No grant or loan by the corporation to any eligible applicant shall adversely affect any grant, loan or service to the eligible applicant by any other unit or instrumentality of state government. SECTION 4. (1)  The corporation shall provide fund monies to be used solely for publicly-owned or publicly-regulated infrastructure directly related to housing development, including: (a)  Water systems; (b)  Wastewater systems; (c)  Stormwater runoff and drainage management; (d)  Access roads and site-entry improvements; (e)  Utility extensions necessary to serve housing developments; (f)  Site preparation; and (g)  Risk- and threat-mitigation measures. (2)  Fund monies shall not be used for any of the following purposes: (a)  Construction and/or rehabilitation of housing units; (b)  Housing and/or rental subsidies; (c)  Maintenance and/or operating expenses; or (d)  Land acquisition. SECTION 5.  (1) The corporation shall disburse fund monies to eligible applicants in the form of grants or low-interest loans, as determined by the corporation. (2)  Grants may be awarded in amounts not exceeding Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) per project, subject to available funds. (3)  (a)  Loans may be issued at an interest rate not exceeding two percent (2%) per annum, for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years.  The amount of each loan shall be determined by the department. (b)  Loan repayments shall be returned to the fund for future use. SECTION 6. (1)  In order to qualify for fund monies for a project, an eligible applicant must demonstrate nonstate matching funds equal to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of total project costs. (2)  Matching funds may include cash contributions, documented infrastructure expenditures and other eligible nonstate capital investments approved by the corporation. (3)  The corporation shall establish documentation and verification standards for all matching funds. (4)  In awarding fund monies, the corporation shall give priority to projects that: (a)  Serve rural or underserved communities; (b)  Support workforce or affordable housing development; (c)  Address documented housing shortages; (d)  Leverage substantial private investment exceeding the minimum match; and (e)  Demonstrate project readiness and feasibility. (5)  An eligible applicant that is a local governmental entity and is awarded fund monies shall not enforce or implement any lot and/or home size restrictions for project areas. SECTION 7. (1)  The corporation shall annually prepare and submit a report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Chairs of the House and Senate Housing Committees that comprehensively details the following information related to the Mississippi Housing Infrastructure Support Fund: (a)  All funds awarded, broken down by (i) grants, and (ii) low-interest loans; (b)  Project locations; (c)  Total project costs, including nonstate matching funds; (d)  Total private investment leveraged; and (e)  The estimated number of housing developments and units enabled through the program. (2)  The corporation shall provide public disclosure of all funded projects. SECTION 8. This article shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2032. SECTION 9.  Sections 1 through 8 of this act shall be codified as a new Article 13 in Chapter 33, Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.